Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 5 P UBLIC WATER SYSTEMS
12-5-187. Emergency orders; hearing; review.

Whenever the director finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health, he may, without notice or hearing, issue an order reciting the existence of such an emergency and requiring that such action be taken as he deems necessary to meet the emergency. Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Sections 12-5-185 and 12-5-186, such order shall be effective immediately. Any person to whom such order is directed shall comply therewith immediately but shall be afforded a hearing within 20 days of the issuance of same. Notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be specified in such order. The hearing shall be conducted by a hearing officer appointed by the Board of Natural Resources. Based upon findings adduced at such hearing, the order shall be modified, revoked, or continued by the hearing officer as he deems appropriate. Review of the hearing officer's decision shall be conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 17.)

12-5-188. Injunctive relief.

Whenever in the judgment of the director any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or will constitute an unlawful action under this part, he may make application to the superior court of the county in which the unlawful act or practice has been or is about to be engaged in or in which jurisdiction is appropriate for an order enjoining such act or practice, or for an order requiring compliance with the part; and upon a showing by the director that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any such act or practice, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing lack of an adequate remedy at law.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 20.)

12-5-189. Judgment in accordance with director's order.

The director may file in the superior court of the county wherein the person under order resides, or if the person is a corporation, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business, or in the county wherein the violation occurred or in which jurisdiction is appropriate, a certified copy of a final order of the director unappealed from or a final order of the director affirmed upon appeal, whereupon the court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though the judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 21.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey of administrative law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2005). For annual survey of appellate practice and procedure, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 35 (2005).

12-5-190. Legal assistance by Attorney General.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General to represent the director or the Board of Natural Resources or designate some member of his staff to represent either or both in all actions in connection with this part.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 18.)

Cross references.

- Attorney General, T. 45, C. 15, A. 1.

12-5-191. Prohibited acts.

Subject to subsection (b) of Code Section 12-5-179 it shall be unlawful for any person to own or operate a public water system without first having secured a permit for such operation from the director.

It shall be unlawful for an owner or operator of a public water system to commit or cause the commission of the following acts:

Failure to comply with the requirements of Code Section 12-5-184 or dissemination of any false or misleading information with respect to notices required pursuant to Code Section 12-5-184 or with respect to remedial actions being undertaken to achieve compliance with the Georgia primary drinking water regulations;

Failure to comply with regulations promulgated pursuant to this part or with conditions for variances or exemptions authorized under Code Section 12-5-178.

(Code 1933, § 88-2605, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 14.)

12-5-192. Civil penalties; procedures for imposing penalty; hearing; review.

For any public water system serving 10,000 or more individuals, any person violating any provision of this part or any permit condition or limitation established pursuant to this part or negligently or intentionally failing or refusing to comply with any final order of the director issued as provided in this part shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 per day per violation.

For any public water system serving fewer than 10,000 individuals, any person violating any provision of this part or any permit condition or limitation established pursuant to this part or negligently or intentionally failing or refusing to comply with any final order of the director issued as provided in this part shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for the first day of each violation and a subsequent additional civil penalty not to exceed $500.00 per violation for each additional day during which the violation continues.

Any person willfully violating any provision of this part or any permit condition or limitation established pursuant to this part or willfully failing or refusing to comply with any final order of the director issued as provided in this part shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.00 per day per violation.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of this part or has negligently or willfully failed or refused to comply with any final order of the director, he or she may, upon written request, cause a hearing to be conducted before a hearing officer appointed by the Board of Natural Resources. Upon a finding that such person has violated any provision of this part or has negligently or willfully failed or refused to comply with a final order of the director, the hearing officer shall issue his or her initial decision imposing such civil penalties as are provided in this Code section. Such hearing and any administrative or judicial review thereof shall be conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 19; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1667, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For review of 1998 legislation relating to conservation and natural resources, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 21 (1998).

12-5-193. Criminal penalty.

Any person who engages in any action made unlawful by this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day of continued violation after conviction shall constitute a separate offense.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 22.)